Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE I. MEDICAL RECORDS

CHAPTER 182. ELECTRONIC EXCHANGE OF HEALTH INFORMATION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 182.001. PURPOSE. This chapter establishes the Texas Health Services Authority as a public-private collaborative to implement the state-level health information technology functions identified by the Texas Health Information Technology Advisory Committee by serving as a catalyst for the development of a seamless electronic health information infrastructure to support the health care system in the state and to improve patient safety and quality of care.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the corporation.

(2) "Corporation" means the Texas Health Services Authority.

(2-a) "Covered entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 181.001.

(3) "De-identified protected health information" means protected health information that is not individually identifiable health information as that term is defined by the privacy rule of the Administrative Simplification subtitle of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191) contained in 45 C.F.R. Part 160 and 45 C.F.R. Part 164, Subparts A and E.

(3-a) "Disclose" has the meaning assigned by Section 181.001.

(3-b) "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and Privacy Standards" has the meaning assigned by Section 181.001.

(4) "Individually identifiable health information" means individually identifiable health information as that term is defined by the privacy rule of the Administrative Simplification subtitle of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191) contained in 45 C.F.R. Part 160 and 45 C.F.R. Part 164, Subparts A and E.

(5) "Physician" means:

(A) an individual licensed to practice medicine in this state under the authority of Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code;

(B) a professional entity organized in conformity with Title 7, Business Organizations Code, and permitted to practice medicine under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code;

(C) a partnership organized in conformity with Title 4, Business Organizations Code, composed entirely of individuals licensed to practice medicine under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code;

(D) an approved nonprofit health corporation certified under Chapter 162, Occupations Code;

(E) a medical school or medical and dental unit, as defined or described by Section 61.003, 61.501, or 74.601, Education Code, that employs or contracts with physicians to teach or provide medical services or employs physicians and contracts with physicians in a practice plan; or

(F) an entity wholly owned by individuals licensed to practice medicine under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code.

(6) "Protected health information" means protected health information as that term is defined by the privacy rule of the Administrative Simplification subtitle of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191) contained in 45 C.F.R. Part 160 and 45 C.F.R. Part 164, Subparts A and E.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1126 (H.B. 300), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2012.

Sec. 182.004. APPLICATION OF SUNSET ACT. The Texas Health Services Authority is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the corporation is abolished and this section, Section 182.001, and Subchapters B and C expire September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 182.051. TEXAS HEALTH SERVICES AUTHORITY; PURPOSE. (a) The corporation is established to:

(1) promote, implement, and facilitate the voluntary and secure electronic exchange of health information; and

(2) create incentives to promote, implement, and facilitate the voluntary and secure electronic exchange of health information.

(b) The corporation is a public nonprofit corporation and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, has all the powers and duties incident to a nonprofit corporation under the Business Organizations Code.

(c) The corporation is subject to state law governing nonprofit corporations, except that:

(1) the corporation may not be placed in receivership; and

(2) the corporation is not required to make reports to the secretary of state under Section 22.357, Business Organizations Code.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, all expenses of the corporation shall be paid from income of the corporation.

(e) The corporation is subject to Chapter 551, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.053. COMPOSITION OF BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (a) The corporation is governed by a board of 12 directors appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate.

(b) The governor shall also appoint at least two ex officio, nonvoting members representing the health and human services agencies as state agency data resources.

(b-1) The governor shall appoint as a voting board member one individual who represents Texas local health information exchanges.

(c) The governor shall appoint as voting board members individuals who represent consumers, clinical laboratories, health benefit plans, hospitals, regional health information exchange initiatives, pharmacies, physicians, or rural health providers, or who possess expertise in any other area the governor finds necessary for the successful operation of the corporation.

(d) An individual may not serve on the board of the corporation if the individual serves on the board of any other governmental body in this state.

(e) Appointments to the board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees.

(f) An individual may not serve on the board of the corporation, in any capacity, if the individual has made a gift or grant, in cash or in kind, to the corporation.

(g) An individual may not serve on the board of the corporation, in any capacity, if the individual is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession or entity that is engaged in the providing of health care, the review or analysis of health care, the payment for health care services or procedures, or the providing of information technology.

(h) In this section, "health and human services agencies" includes the:

(1) department;

(2) Department of Aging and Disability Services;

(3) Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services;

(4) Department of Family and Protective Services; and

(5) commission.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0524, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 182.054. TERMS OF OFFICE. Appointed members of the board serve two-year terms and may continue to serve until a successor has been appointed by the governor.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.055. EXPENSES. Members of the board serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses in attending meetings of the board or performing other official duties authorized by the presiding officer.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.056. OFFICERS; CONFLICT OF INTEREST. (a) The governor shall designate a member of the board as presiding officer to serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the governor.

(b) Any board member or a member of a committee formed by the board with direct interest in a matter, personally or through an employer, before the board shall abstain from deliberations and actions on the matter in which the conflict of interest arises and shall further abstain on any vote on the matter, and may not otherwise participate in a decision on the matter.

(c) Each board member shall file a conflict of interest statement and a statement of ownership interests with the board to ensure disclosure of all existing and potential personal interests related to board business.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.057. PROHIBITION ON CERTAIN CONTRACTS AND EMPLOYMENT. The board may not compensate, employ, or contract with any individual who serves as a member of the board or advisory council to any other governmental body, including any agency, council, or committee, in this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.058. MEETINGS. (a) The board may meet as often as necessary, but shall meet at least twice a year.

(b) The board shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the board and to speak on any issue under the authority of the corporation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.059. CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER; PERSONNEL. The board may hire a chief executive officer. Under the direction of the board, the chief executive officer shall perform the duties required by this chapter or designated by the board. The chief executive officer may hire additional staff to carry out the responsibilities of the corporation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.060. TECHNOLOGY POLICY. The board shall implement a policy requiring the corporation to use appropriate technological solutions to improve the corporation's ability to perform its functions. The policy must ensure that the public is able to interact with the corporation on the Internet.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.061. LIABILITIES OF AUTHORITY. Liabilities created by the corporation are not debts or obligations of the state, and the corporation may not secure any liability with funds or assets of the state except as otherwise provided by law.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 182.062. BOARD MEMBER IMMUNITY. (a) A board member may not be held civilly liable for an act performed, or omission made, in good faith in the performance of the member's powers and duties under this chapter.

(b) A cause of action does not arise against a member of the board for an act or omission described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 182.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The corporation may:

(1) establish statewide health information exchange capabilities, including capabilities for electronic laboratory results, diagnostic studies, and medication history delivery, and, where applicable, promote definitions and standards for electronic interactions statewide;

(2) seek funding to:

(A) implement, promote, and facilitate the voluntary exchange of secure electronic health information between and among individuals and entities that are providing or paying for health care services or procedures; and

(B) create incentives to implement, promote, and facilitate the voluntary exchange of secure electronic health information between and among individuals and entities that are providing or paying for health care services or procedures;

(3) establish statewide health information exchange capabilities for streamlining health care administrative functions including:

(A) communicating point of care services, including laboratory results, diagnostic imaging, and prescription histories;

(B) communicating patient identification and emergency room required information in conformity with state and federal privacy laws;

(C) real-time communication of enrollee status in relation to health plan coverage, including enrollee cost-sharing responsibilities; and

(D) current census and status of health plan contracted providers;

(4) support regional health information exchange initiatives by:

(A) identifying data and messaging standards for health information exchange;

(B) administering programs providing financial incentives, including grants and loans for the creation and support of regional health information networks, subject to available funds;

(C) providing technical expertise where appropriate;

(D) sharing intellectual property developed under Section 182.105;

(E) waiving the corporation's fees associated with intellectual property, data, expertise, and other services or materials provided to regional health information exchanges operated on a nonprofit basis; and

(F) applying operational and technical standards developed by the corporation to existing health information exchanges only on a voluntary basis, except for standards related to ensuring effective privacy and security of individually identifiable health information;

(5) identify standards for streamlining health care administrative functions across payors and providers, including electronic patient registration, communication of enrollment in health plans, and information at the point of care regarding services covered by health plans; and

(6) support the secure, electronic exchange of health information through other strategies identified by the board.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 12.003, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(3), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.102. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) The corporation has no authority and shall not engage in any of the following:

(1) the collection and analysis of clinical data;

(2) the comparison of physicians to other physicians, including comparisons to peer group physicians, physician groups, and physician teams, and to national specialty society adopted quality measurements;

(3) the creation of a tool to measure physician performance compared to:

(A) peer group physicians on state and specialty levels; or

(B) objective standards;

(4) the providing of access to aggregated, de-identified protected health information to local health information exchanges and other users of quality care studies, disease management and population health assessments;

(5) providing to public health programs trended, aggregated, de-identified protected health information to help assess the health status of populations and the providing of regular reports of trends and important incidence of events to public health avenues for intervention, education, and prevention programs; or

(6) the creation of evidence-based standards for the practice of medicine.

(b) The corporation has no authority and shall not disseminate information, in any manner, to the public that compares, rates, tiers, classifies, measures, or ranks a physician's performance, efficiency, or quality of practice.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.103. PRIVACY OF INFORMATION. (a) Protected health information and individually identifiable health information collected, assembled, or maintained by the corporation is confidential and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(b) The corporation shall comply with all state and federal laws and rules relating to the transmission of health information, including Chapter 181, and rules adopted under that chapter, and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191) and rules adopted under that Act.

(c) The corporation shall develop privacy, security, operational, and technical standards to assist health information networks in the state to ensure effective statewide privacy, data security, efficiency, and interoperability across networks. The network's standards shall be guided by reference to the standards of the Certification Commission for Healthcare Information Technology or the Health Information Technology Standards Panel, or other federally approved certification standards, that exist on May 1, 2007, as to the process of implementation, acquisition, upgrade, or installation of electronic health information technology.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0525, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(5), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.104. SECURITY COMPLIANCE. (a) The corporation shall:

(1) establish appropriate security standards to protect both the transmission and the receipt of individually identifiable health information or health care data;

(2) establish appropriate security standards to protect access to any individually identifiable health information or health care data collected, assembled, or maintained by the corporation;

(3) establish the highest levels of security and protection for access to and control of individually identifiable health information, including mental health care data and data relating to specific disease status, that is governed by more stringent state or federal privacy laws; and

(4) establish policies and procedures for the corporation for taking disciplinary actions against a board member, employee, or other person with access to individually identifiable health care information that violates state or federal privacy laws related to health care information or data maintained by the corporation.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(6), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.105. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY. (a) The corporation shall take commercially reasonable measures to protect its intellectual property, including obtaining patents, trademarks, and copyrights where appropriate.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(7), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.106. ANNUAL REPORT. (a) The corporation shall submit an annual report to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the appropriate oversight committee in the senate and the house of representatives. The annual report must include financial information and a progress update on the corporation's efforts to carry out its mission.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(8), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.107. FUNDING. (a) The corporation may be funded through the General Appropriations Act and may request, accept, and use gifts and grants as necessary to implement its functions.

(b) The corporation may assess transaction, convenience, or subscription fees to cover costs associated with implementing its functions. All fees must be voluntary but receipt of services provided by the corporation may be conditioned on payment of fees.

(c) The corporation may participate in other revenue-generating activities that are consistent with the corporation's purposes.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 1066), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 182.108. STANDARDS FOR ELECTRONIC SHARING OF PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION; COVERED ENTITY CERTIFICATION. (a) The corporation shall develop and submit to the commission for ratification privacy and security standards for the electronic sharing of protected health information.

(b) The commission shall review and the executive commissioner by rule shall adopt acceptable standards submitted for ratification under Subsection (a).

(c) Standards adopted under Subsection (b) must be designed to:

(1) comply with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and Privacy Standards and Chapter 181;

(2) comply with any other state and federal law relating to the security and confidentiality of information electronically maintained or disclosed by a covered entity;

(3) ensure the secure maintenance and disclosure of personally identifiable health information;

(4) include strategies and procedures for disclosing personally identifiable health information; and

(5) support a level of system interoperability with existing health record databases in this state that is consistent with emerging standards.

(d) The corporation shall establish a process by which a covered entity may apply for certification by the corporation of a covered entity's past compliance with standards adopted under Subsection (b).

(e) The corporation shall publish the standards adopted under Subsection (b) on the corporation's Internet website.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1126 (H.B. 300), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0526, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 203), Sec. 15(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 2(10), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1169 (H.B. 3304), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGES

Sec. 182.151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "health information exchange" means an organization that:

(1) assists in the transmission or receipt of health-related information among organizations transmitting or receiving the information according to nationally recognized standards and under an express written agreement with the organizations;

(2) as a primary business function, compiles or organizes health-related information designed to be securely transmitted by the organization among physicians, other health care providers, or entities within a region, state, community, or hospital system; or

(3) assists in the transmission or receipt of electronic health-related information among physicians, other health care providers, or entities within:

(A) a hospital system;

(B) a physician organization;

(C) a health care collaborative, as defined by Section 848.001, Insurance Code;

(D) an accountable care organization participating in the Pioneer Model under the initiative by the Innovation Center of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; or

(E) an accountable care organization participating in the Medicare Shared Savings Program under 42 U.S.C. Section 1395jjj.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 182.152. AUTHORITY OF HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGE. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 81.046, 82.009, 161.0073, and 161.008, a health information exchange may access and transmit health-related information under Sections 81.044(a), 82.008(a), 161.007(d), 161.00705(a), 161.00706(b), and 161.008(i) if the access or transmittal is:

(1) made for the purpose of assisting in the reporting of health-related information to the appropriate agency;

(2) requested and authorized by the appropriate health care provider, practitioner, physician, facility, clinical laboratory, or other person who is required to report health-related information;

(3) made in accordance with the applicable consent requirements for the immunization registry under Subchapter A, Chapter 161, if the information being accessed or transmitted relates to the immunization registry; and

(4) made in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter and all other state and federal law.

(b) A health information exchange may only use and disclose the information that it accesses or transmits under Subsection (a) in compliance with this subchapter and all applicable state and federal law, and may not exchange, sell, trade, or otherwise make any prohibited use or disclosure of the information.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 182.153. COMPLIANCE WITH LAW; SECURITY. A health information exchange that collects, transmits, disseminates, accesses, or reports health-related information under this subchapter shall comply with all applicable state and federal law, including secure electronic data submission requirements.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 182.154. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person who collects, transmits, disseminates, accesses, or reports information under this subchapter on behalf of or as a health information exchange commits an offense if the person, with the intent to violate this subchapter, allows health-related information in the possession of a health information exchange to be used or disclosed in a manner that violates this subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 182.155. IMMUNITIES AND DEFENSES CONTINUED. Collecting, transmitting, disseminating, accessing, or reporting information through a health information exchange does not alone deprive a physician or health care provider of an otherwise applicable immunity or defense.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.